Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 10 Armories and Campgrounds

30-10-1.
Control and maintenance.

All arsenals, armories, quarters, military storehouses, campgrounds, rifle ranges, and other military facilities owned, leased, or controlled by the state, except those that are by law especially entrusted to the keeping of other officers, that are used for military purposes, shall be under the control of the adjutant general, who shall also have supervisory responsibility for all repairs, maintenance, upkeep, and janitorial services of these properties.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any individual employed, as of June 26, 1986, in any of these military facilities, shall retain his or her current employee classification and status and no current or future benefits gained pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement shall be diminished.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 125; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-1

; P.L. 1986, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 190, § 1.

30-10-2.
Rules and regulations.

The adjutant general may make all proper rules and regulations for the government and use of all arsenals, armories, quarters, military storehouses, camp grounds, rifle ranges, and other military facilities owned, leased, or controlled by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 126; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-2

.

30-10-3.
General use of armories.

The armories owned, rented, leased, or controlled by the state shall not be used for other than military purposes except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 127; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-3

.

30-10-4.
Use of armories for social and athletic purposes.

The adjutant general may authorize the use of any armory, under his or her control, for the social and athletic purposes of the organizations quartered there.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 128; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-4

.

30-10-5.
Use of armories by armed services.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other general or public law, the governor, with the approval of the adjutant general, is hereby authorized to make available, from time to time, to the soldiers, sailors, air persons, and marines now serving their country, the facilities of the several state armories to be used without charge to them, for recreational, athletic, and such other purposes as under all circumstances may seem proper to the governor and to the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 994, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-5

.

30-10-6.
Rental of armories for nonmilitary purposes.

The adjutant general may authorize the use of any armory under his or her control, for nonmilitary purposes, subject to such rules and conditions as he or she may prescribe, that are lawful and approved, provided that the person, corporation, organization, or society to whom the use may be authorized shall pay in advance to the adjutant general such a sum for the use thereof as may be prescribed by the adjutant general. This sum shall in no case, where admission is charged, be less than the fair rental value of halls of a similar nature, in the same or a similar city or town. These persons, corporations, organizations, or societies shall, if required by the adjutant general, furnish a bond, with good and sufficient surety, to protect and indemnify the state from loss or damage to the armory, or to any federal or state property, or to the property of any military organization or members thereof, contained therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 129; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-6

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 34.

30-10-7.
Use of armories by veterans’ organizations.

The adjutant general may authorize the use of any armory under his or her control, when not required for military purposes, by any regularly organized body of veterans of the wars of the United States, subject to such rules and conditions as he or she may prescribe, for the purpose of holding meetings for the conduct of its business without any charge therefor, other than a necessary fee for janitor service and attendants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 130; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-7

.

30-10-8.
Use of armories for Veterans’ Day celebrations.

The adjutant general may authorize the use of any armory under his or her control, subject to such rules and conditions as he or she may prescribe, by the veterans’ councils of the various cities and towns, including any district or department groups, organized within the state as a world war veterans’ organization holding a charter issued by a national organization of the same name, for the annual holding of meetings, exercises, events, or balls in connection with the celebration of Veterans’ Day, November 11, whether or not admission is charged, without any charge therefor other than the necessary fees for janitor service, heat, and light; provided that the meetings, exercises, events, or balls are held under the direction of the veterans’ councils, or district or department group, duly authorized, as above.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 131; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-8

.

30-10-9.
Appropriations for rent of armories.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary and sufficient to provide for the armory rental of the national guard, to be paid upon proper vouchers certified to by the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 133; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-9

.

30-10-10.
Appropriations for maintenance of armories.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary and sufficient to provide for the repair, care, maintenance, upkeep, and janitorial service of the various armories owned, rented, leased, and controlled by the state, occupied and used by the national guard, and under the control of the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 134; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-10

.

30-10-11.
Maintenance of state arsenal in Providence.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of heating, lighting, and maintaining the state arsenal on Benefit Street in the city of Providence occupied by the Providence marine corps of artillery, so long as these premises are also occupied by the Sons of Union Veterans of the Civil War, or the United Spanish War Veterans, or the associated or auxiliary organizations of any of them, as quarters for the different posts camps, or headquarters for the department of Rhode Island, and so long as these premises are also occupied by the first light infantry regiment, Rhode Island militia, or the first light infantry veterans, or any organization auxiliary to them, or so long as any portion of these premises is also occupied for any other purpose under the authority of the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1561, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 363, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 416, § 16; P.L. 1938, ch. 2616, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 632, § 5; P.L. 1943, ch. 1373, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-11

.

30-10-12.
Federal agreements.

The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to negotiate, cooperate, and enter into agreements on behalf of this state, with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, in order to satisfy the provisions, and conditions pursuant to the provisions, of 10 U.S.C. § 18231 et seq. (Facilities for Reserve Components).

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2995, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-12

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 12.

30-10-13.
Use of federal funds.

The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to accept and direct the disbursement of the funds made available to the state, pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 18231 et seq. (Facilities for Reserve Components) and shall deposit all these funds received from the federal government with the general treasurer, to be placed in a special account, and drawn upon only on receipt of properly authenticated vouchers signed by the adjutant general with the approval of the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2995, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-10-13

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 12.

30-10-14.
Chief Warrant Officer Everett Babcock Building.

Building T-17, located at Fort Varnum, Narragansett, Rhode Island, shall hereafter be named the Chief Warrant Officer Everett Babcock Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 93, § 1.